District of Columbia statutes.
5-807

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply upon adoption of regulations by the Chief of Police to implement this chapter. The Chief of Police shall adopt such regulations within 60 days of October 4, 2000.

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law § 13-160, § 508, 47 DCR 4619